Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.014

Board—Officers—Members' compensation and travel expenses.

The board shall meet at the places and times it determines and as often as necessary to discharge its duties. The board shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from among its members. Members must be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 in addition to travel expenses provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

[ 2022 c 240 s 29; 2020 c 248 s 2; 1990 c 147 s 4; 1984 c 287 s 26; 1982 c 21 s 9.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.